DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLESTABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI-313

DIARS-01

ABS Warning Light Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

If the ECU detects trouble, it lights the ABS warning light while at the same time prohibiting ABS control. At
this time, the ECU records a DTC in memory.

Connectterminals Tcand E ’ ofthe check connectorto make the ABS warning light blink and outputthe DTC.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Troubleshoot in accordance with the chart below for each trouble symptom.

1

ABS warning light does not light up *

ABS warning light remains on #
*': Startthe inspectionfrom step 1in case of usingthe hand -heldtesterand startfrom step 2in case of not
uésing hand -heldtester.
* : Afterinspection with step 4, startthe inspection from step 5 in case of using the hand -heldtesterand
startfrom step 6 in case of not using hand -heldtester.

1 Check operation ofthe ABS warning light.

PREPARATION:

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Turntheignition switch ON and pushthe hand -heldtester main switch ON.
(c) Selectthe ACTIVE TEST mode onthe hand -heldtester.

CHECK:

Checkthat”’ON”and”OFF” ofthe ABS warning light can be shown on the combination meter onthe hand
held tester.

@

2 | Does the warning lights other than ABS warning lights up?

0K> Check and replace skid control ECU.

meter assembly.

YES> Repair ABS warning light bulb or combination
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3 | Check IG1 No. 1 relay.

BE 1840
R15257
R15258

F00044

@

PREPARATION:
Remove IG1 No. 1 relay from engine room J/B.
CHECK:
Check continuity between each pair of terminal of IG1 No. 1
relay.
OK:
Terminals 3 and 4 Continuity
Terminals 1 and 2 Open
CHECK:

(@) Apply battery voltage between terminals 3 and 4.

(b)  Check continuity between terminals.

Terminals 1 and 2 |

Continuity

NG> Replace IG1 No. 1 relay.

(See page IN-38).

Check for open circuit in harness and connector between IG1 No. 1 relay and combination meter
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4 | Check that the ECU connectors are securely connected to the ECU.

NO> Connect the connector to the ECU.

YES

5 | Check operation of the ABS warning light (See step 1).

0K> Check and replace skid control ECU.

e ]

6 |Is DTC output?

Check DTC on page DI-185.

YES> Repair circuit indicated by the output code.

@

7 Check for short circuit in harness and connector between ABS warning light and skid
control ECU (See page IN-38).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

@

Check and repair skid control ECU.
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